Florida, session 2026, HB1311.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The following rules are ratified for the sole
and exclusive purpose of satisfying any condition on
effectiveness imposed under chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida:
Rules 69C-2.004, 69C-2.005, 69C-2.016, 69C-2.022, 69C-2.026,
69C-2.034, 69C-2.035, 69U-100.097, 69V-560.1000, 69V-560.1012,
69V-560.102, 69V-560.7032, 69V-560.7033, 69V-560.7034, 69V-
560.7035, and 69V-560.7036, Florida Administrative Code,
entitled "Definitions," "Designation of a Qualified Public
Depository," "Financial Information Reports by a Qualified
Public Depository," "Requirements of Public Depositors,"
"Administration of Payment of Losses," "Disqualification,
Suspension, and Administrative Penalty," "Custodians of Gold
Coin or Silver Coin," "Gold Coin or Silver Coin Deposits,"
"Disciplinary Guidelines," "Adoption of Forms," "Application or
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1311 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1311, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
Appointment Procedures and Requirements," "Records to Be
Maintained when Engaged in Transactions Involving Gold and
Silver Coin," "Gold Coin and Silver Coin Disclosures,"
"Accredited Refiner or Wholesaler of Gold Coin or Silver Coin,"
"Chain of Custody Related to Gold or Silver Coin," and "Rapid
Response Time by Law Enforcement," respectively, as filed for
adoption with the Department of State pursuant to the
certification packages dated October 31, 2025, and November 1,
2025.
Section 2. Section 18 of chapter 2025-100, Laws of
Florida, is repealed.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1311 -03-er